Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-317 Contingent liability of members.
(a) Each member of a domestic mutual insurer, except as otherwise provided in
this part, shall have a contingent liability, pro rata and not one for another,
for the discharge of its obligations. The contingent liability shall be in
such maximum amount as is stated in the insurer's articles of incorporation,
but shall be not less than one, nor more than five, additional premiums for the
member's policy at the annual premium rate and for a term of one year.

(b) Every policy issued by the insurer shall
contain a statement of the contingent liability.

(c) Termination of the policy of any member
shall not relieve the member of contingent liability for the member's
proportion of the obligations of the insurer which accrued while the policy was
in force. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next